Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.250.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Multidistrict online provider" means:

(i) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into a contract with a school district to provide online courses or programs to K-12 students from more than one school district;

(ii) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into contracts with multiple school districts to provide online courses or programs to K-12 students from those districts; or

(iii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a school district that provides online courses or programs to students who reside outside the geographic boundaries of the school district.

(b) "Multidistrict online provider" does not include a school district online learning program in which fewer than ten percent of the students enrolled in the program are from other districts under the interdistrict student transfer provisions of RCW 28A.225.225. "Multidistrict online provider" also does not include regional online learning programs that are jointly developed and implemented by two or more school districts or an educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative program agreement that addresses, at minimum, how the districts share student full-time equivalency for state basic education funding purposes and how categorical education programs, including special education, are provided to eligible students.

(2)(a) "Online course" means a course or grade-level coursework where:

(i) More than half of the course content is delivered electronically using the internet or other computer-based methods;

(ii) More than half of the teaching is conducted from a remote location through an online course learning management system or other online or electronic tools;

(iii) A certificated teacher has the primary responsibility for the student's instructional interaction. Instructional interaction between the teacher and the student includes, but is not limited to, direct instruction, review of assignments, assessment, testing, progress monitoring, and educational facilitation; and

(iv) Students have access to the teacher synchronously, asynchronously, or both.

(b) "Online school program" means a school program that offers a sequential set of online courses or grade-level coursework that may be taken in a single school term or throughout the school year in a manner that could provide a full-time basic education program if so desired by the student. Students may enroll in the program as part-time or full-time students.

(c) An online course or online school program may be delivered to students at school as part of the regularly scheduled school day. An online course or online school program also may be delivered to students, in whole or in part, independently from a regular classroom schedule, but such courses or programs must comply with RCW 28A.232.010 and associated rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction to qualify for state basic education funding.

(3) "Online provider" means any provider of an online course or program, including multidistrict online providers, all school district online learning programs, and all regional online learning programs.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 504; 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 5; 2009 c 542 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 34: See RCW 28A.232.005.